Colorado, session 2026A, HB1353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1006.3, amend
(1)(a) introductory portion and (1)(a)(III) as follows:
22-7-1006.3. State assessments - administration - rules -
definitions.
(1) (a) Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, The department of
education, in collaboration with local education providers, shall administer
the state assessments in the instructional areas of English language arts,
mathematics, science, and social studies, as adopted by the state board
pursuant to section 22-7-1006, as follows:
(III) The department shall administer a state assessment in social
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

studies to students enrolled in public elementary and middle schools
throughout the state. The department shall select the specific grades in
which to administer the state social studies assessment, ensuring that
students take the state social studies assessment once in elementary school
and once in middle school. The department shall administer the social
studies assessment required by this subsection (1)(a)(III) in a representative
sample of public schools each school year, ensuring that it administers the
social studies assessment in each public school at least once every three
years. A school district, for one or more of the schools of the school district
that are not included in the representative sample, or a charter school that
is not included in the representative sample, may request that the
department administer the assessment in the district school or charter
school. The department shall administer the social studies assessment in the
requested school in the school year following the school year in which it
receives the request SEVENTH GRADE IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS THROUGHOUT THE
STATE.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the cash funds appropriation from the state education fund created in
section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of education for the statewide assessment program is decreased by
$302,835.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the cash funds appropriation from the state
education fund made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year to the department of education for the statewide assessment
program is less than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1)
of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include a cash funds appropriation from the state education
fund to the department of education for the statewide assessment program.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1353

except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1353

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1353